Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 4.1. Voluntary Remediation.

§§ 10.1-1429.1 through 10.1-1429.3.
Repealed by Acts 2002, c. 378, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2002.

Cross references.

For the Brownfield Restoration and Land Renewal Act, see now §

10.1-1230

et seq.

Editor’s note.

Former §

10.1-1429.1

, pertaining to regulation of voluntary remediation; cleanup standards; permit requirements; registration fees, was derived from Acts 1995, cc. 609, 622; 2001, c. 587. Former § 10.1-1429.2, pertaining to immunity to enforcement actions, was derived from Acts 1995, cc. 609, 622. Former § 10.1-1429.3, pertaining to
site access, was derived from Acts 1995, cc. 609, 622.